Washington statutes.
RCW 16.52.180

Limitations on application of chapter.

No part of this chapter shall be deemed to interfere with any of the laws of this state known as the "game laws," nor be deemed to interfere with the right to destroy any venomous reptile or any known as dangerous to life, limb or property, or to interfere with the right to kill animals to be used for food or with any properly conducted scientific experiments or investigations, which experiments or investigations shall be performed only under the authority of the faculty of some regularly incorporated college or university of the state of Washington or a research facility registered with the United States department of agriculture and regulated by 7 U.S.C. Sec. 2131 et seq.

[ 1994 c 261 s 12; 1901 c 146 s 18; RRS s 3201.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—1994 c 261: See note following RCW 16.52.011.